Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4301
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that because of the fear and stigma that often results from crimes of sexual assault or domestic violence, and because of the risk of retaliatory violence by the perpetrator, many victims hesitate to seek help even when it is available at no cost to them. Without assurances that communications made while receiving assistance in overcoming the adverse effects of a sexual assault or domestic violence situation will be confidential and protected from disclosure, victims will be even more reluctant to seek assistance or to confide openly to their advocates and to explore legal and social remedies fully. As a result, victims may fail to receive needed vital care and counseling and thus lack the support, resources, and information necessary to recover from the crime, to report the crime, to assist in the prosecution of the crime, to participate effectively in the justice system, to achieve legal protections, and to prevent future sexual assaults and domestic violence. This is a matter of statewide concern, and the prevention of violence is for the protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the public.

Laws 2004, LB 613, § 1.